Wisconsin, session 2025, SB55.
do enact as follows:SB55,14Section 1. 165.252 of the statutes is created to read:SB55,2,35165.252 Nongovernmental employees. (1) Except as provided under sub. 1(2) or s. 20.9305 (2), the department of justice may not use the legal services of any 2person who is not a state employee or federal employee or agent to assist in the 3investigation or prosecution of any civil or criminal cause or matter.SB55,2,64(2) The department of justice may use the legal services of a legal intern who 5is not a state employee or federal employee or agent if the person is paid no more 6than $10,000 per year by the person’s internship employer.SB55,2,77